Montana, session 2025, HB701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Calculating attorney fees awarded against government entity. In a
legal action in which attorney fees are assessed, awarded, or otherwise incurred, whether by operation of law
or by order of a court, against the state, a political subdivision, or an agency of the state or a political
subdivision, the attorney fees must be calculated not to exceed the hourly salary rate paid to the attorney
general, as determined under 2-16-405, multiplied by the number of attorney hours devoted to the action.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 25, chapter 10, part 7, and the provisions of Title 25, chapter 10, part 7, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 701